District of Columbia statutes.
31-5041.03

Examination of operation of title insurance producers.

(a)

The Commissioner, during normal business hours, may examine, audit, and inspect any and all books and records required and maintained by a title insurance producer; provided, that trust accounts maintained by attorneys shall be subject to any privilege permitted by law and properly asserted.

(b)

The Commissioner may require that the information provided under this section be verified by oath of the title insurance producer or an officer, employee, or accountant of the title insurance producer.

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2124, 57 DCR 6242
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2124 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).